District of Columbia statutes.
8-651.08

Enforcement.

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this chapter, or any regulations issued under the authority of this chapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

June 12, 2003, D.C. Law 14-309, § 108, 50 DCR 888